Massachusetts, session 194th, H159.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 151B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection: --
24. The term “safety sensitive position” shall mean a position with duties that, if
performed while under the influence of drugs or alcohol, could lead to a lapse of attention that
could cause actual, immediate, and permanent physical injury or loss of life to self or others.
SECTION 2. Section 4 of Chapter 151B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding after subsection 19, the following subsections: --
20. For an employer or his agent, because of the presence of tetrahydrocannabinol or
marijuana metabolite in the blood, urine or other body sample provided by the individual, to
refuse to hire or employ or to bar or to discharge from employment such person or to
discriminate against such person in compensation or in terms, conditions or privileges of
of 2

employment, unless reasonable suspicion exists that the employee was impaired by marijuana at
the employee’s place of employment or during the hours of employment.
It shall be a defense to such employment action if the employee, due to the presence of
tetrahydrocannabinol or marijuana metabolite in the blood, urine or other body sample provided
by the individual, is unable to maintain licenses, credentials, or other qualifications that are
reasonably necessary for the performance of the employee’s position, regardless of whether such
licensing, credentialing, or other qualifications prohibit the employee from using marijuana. This
section shall not apply to safety sensitive positions or if compliance would cause the employer to
commit a violation of a federal law, regulation, contract, or funding agreement.
of 2